California statutes. Insurance Code
(3) “Policy of personal lines insurance” means an insurance policy that is designed for and bought by individuals, and includes, but is not limited to, homeowners’ and automobile policies.

(f) The interest penalty required by this section shall not apply to any insurer in conservatorship or liquidation, nor shall this insurer be subject to any other penalty for failure to remit unearned premium in accordance with the time periods required by this section.

(g) (1) An assignment by an insured to an agent or broker of the insured’s right to receive unearned premium shall be valid only for the purpose set forth in Section 1735.5.

(2) If the insured notifies the insurer, 25 or more days after the insurer’s tender of unearned premium to an agent or broker with an assignment pursuant to paragraph (1), that the agent or broker has failed to issue to the insured an accounting of an offset permitted by Section 1735.5, the insurer shall, within an additional 15 days, either tender the unearned premium directly to the insured or provide the insured with the agent’s or broker’s accounting of the offset permitted by Section 1735.5.

(3) Whenever an insurer tenders the net rather than gross unearned premium to an agent or broker or premium finance company, the insurer shall contemporaneously notify the agent or broker of the amount of the unearned commission.

(4) If an insurer elects to tender the net rather than the gross unearned premium to a premium finance company, the insurer shall document that the agent or broker tendered unearned commission to the premium finance company within the period required under subdivision (a) or (b) after the insurer either receives notice of the event that generated the unearned premium, or receives notice from a premium finance company of a cancellation.

(h) Whenever an agent or broker receives a refund from a premium finance company, the agent or broker shall tender that money to the insured within 25 days. Whenever an agent or broker with an assignment from the insured receives unearned premium from an insurer, the agent or broker shall account to the insured for any offset permitted by Section 1735.5 within 25 days. If the agent or broker fails to tender payment of any remaining unearned premium after the offset within 25 days, the agent or broker shall pay the insured interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum from and after the 26th day after the agent or broker receives the refund.

(i) In addition to the required unearned premium refund, an insurer shall provide both the insured and the agent or broker, upon the request of either, with an accounting and explanation of how the amount of the refund was calculated. The explanation shall be clear, concise, and easy to comprehend. The commissioner may adopt regulations setting forth standards to govern this subdivision.

(j) For purposes of subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, if the unearned premium is not assigned as security to a premium finance agency pursuant to a premium finance agreement and the amount of unearned premium is less than twenty-five dollars ($25), tender of unearned premium shall include applying the amount of unearned premium either to the renewal premium at the next renewal date or to other premiums due, provided written notice of either application is given to the insured within 30 days after the endorsement, rejection, declination, cancellation, or surrender of a policy of insurance. At the time of endorsement or surrender of a policy of insurance or, within 15 days after the mailing of the written notice required by this subdivision, the insured may request in writing that the unearned premium be tendered as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive. Whenever the amount of unearned premium is less than five dollars ($5), tender shall be effective and the written notice required by this subdivision shall not be required if the unearned premium is applied either to the renewal premium at the next renewal date or to other premiums due.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, an insurer may at any time solicit the insured’s consent, or may in its policy reserve the right, to apply the unearned premium generated by an amendment or endorsement removing or reducing coverage for an insured person or property to the balance owed on the policy as a whole, rather than tendering a refund of the unearned premium. This subdivision shall not apply if the unearned premium is assigned as security to a premium finance company.

(l) The amount of unearned premium required to be refunded by an insurer pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount paid to the insurer by the insured or by a premium finance company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 450.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

482.

Except as provided by section 481, or by the insurance contract, if a peril insured against has existed, and the insurer has been liable for any period, however short, the insured is not entitled to return of premiums, so far as that particular risk is concerned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

483.

A person insured is entitled to a return of the premium:

(a) When the contract is voidable, on account of the fraud or misrepresentation of the insurer.

(b) When the contract is voidable on account of facts, of the existence of which the insured was ignorant without his fault.

(c) When, by any default of the insured other than actual fraud, the insurer did not incur any liability under the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

484.

An acknowledgment in a policy of the receipt of premium is conclusive evidence of its payment, so far as to make the policy binding. Notwithstanding such acknowledgment, a policy may be canceled effective at such times as otherwise permitted by law for nonpayment of all or any portion of the premium which is actually unpaid if such cancellation right is reserved to the insurer in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

485.

In case of an overinsurance by several insurers, the insured is entitled to a ratable return of the premium, proportioned to the amount by which the aggregate sum insured in all the policies exceeds the insurable value of the subject at risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

486.

When an overinsurance is effected by simultaneous policies, the insurers contribute to the premium to be returned in proportion to the amount insured by their respective policies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

487.

When an overinsurance is effected by successive policies, those only contribute to a return of the premium who are exonerated by prior insurance from the liability assumed by them, and in proportion as the sum for which the premium was paid exceeds the amount for which, on account of prior insurance, they could be made liable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

488.

No insurer shall, in issuing or renewing a private passenger automobile insurance policy, increase the premium on that policy for the reason that the insured or applicant for insurance has been convicted for traffic violations committed while operating a motor vehicle for compensation during the hours of his employment if, with respect to a conviction, the employee or applicant has submitted to the insurer a written declaration made by the employee under penalty of perjury that the applicant or insured was, at that time, operating a motor vehicle for compensation during the hours of his or her employment. This section applies only to those individuals whose specific duties include driving their employer’s motor vehicles or individuals who have authority in their name from the Public Utilities Commission to operate as a highway carrier and who are the registered owners or lease operators of the motor vehicle used in the operation as a highway carrier.

This section does not apply to an insured or applicant for insurance convicted of any of the following:

(a) Homicide or assault arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle for compensation during the hours of employment.

(b) A violation while operating a motor vehicle for compensation during the hours of employment of any of the following sections or section subdivisions of the Vehicle Code:

(1) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.

(2) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.1.

(3) Subdivision (a) of Section 14601.2.

(4) Section 20001 or 20002.

(5) Subdivision (a) of Section 20008.

(6) Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153.

(c) This section shall not apply to a person insured under the California assigned risk plan prescribed by Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

488.5.

(a) An insurer shall not, in issuing or renewing a private automobile insurance policy to a peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter, with respect to his or her operation of a private passenger motor vehicle, increase the premium on that policy for the reason that the insured or applicant for insurance has been involved in an accident while operating an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in subdivision (a) or (f) of Section 165 of the Vehicle Code or in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, or any employer-leased vehicle or employer-rented vehicle, in the performance of his or her duty during the hours of his or her employment, or was involved in an
 accident while operating his or her private passenger motor vehicle in the performance of his or her duty at the request or direction of an employer.

(b) An insurer shall not, in issuing or renewing a private automobile insurance policy to a federal officer or federal customs agent, with respect to his or her operation of a private motor vehicle, increase the premium on that policy for the reason that the insured or applicant for insurance has been involved in an accident while operating an official government vehicle in the performance of his or her duty during the hours of his or her employment.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Peace officer” means every person defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Policy” shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 660.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 823, Sec. 1.   (AB 2298)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

489.

(a) Upon issuance of a policy of insurance described in Section 660, the insurer or its agent shall deliver to the named insured a notice explaining the manner in which the insurer’s rating plan provides for an increase in the premium based upon accidents or convictions within the meaning of Sections 13103 and 13105 of the Vehicle Code.

Every insurer or its agent, not less than 20 days prior to renewal of a policy covered by this section, shall inform the named insured of the named insured’s right to be informed, upon request, of any increase in the premium, in whole or in part, charged the named insured by virtue of the involvement in any accident, or conviction within the meaning of Section 13103 and 13105 of the Vehicle Code, by the insured or any operator of the motor vehicle.

(b) Every insurer shall, after March 1, 1977, as part of the first offer required by Section 663, deliver to everyone who was a named insured under a policy of insurance described in Section 660 on March 1, 1977, a notice explaining the manner in which the insurer’s rating plan provides for an increase in the premium, based upon accidents or convictions within the meaning of Sections 13103 and 13105 of the Vehicle Code. The provisions of this subdivision shall expire on March 1, 1978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

The rating plan of a motor vehicle liability insurer shall not provide for an increase in the premium if based upon an accident in which the insured is not at fault, in any manner, as determined by either the accident report or the insurer. In the event the insurer determines that its insured is at fault contrary to an accident report’s specific finding that the insured is not at fault, the insurer shall reach its conclusion only after an investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.2. Renewal Notices [500. - 500.]

500.

Whenever any insurer has, as a regular course of conduct, sent renewal premium notices to an insured, and intends to discontinue that practice, it shall notify such insured of its intention not to send such notices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.3. Consumer Complaints [510. - 510.]

510.

(a) Whenever a policy of insurance specified in Section 660 or 675, a policy of life insurance as defined in Section 101, a policy of disability insurance as defined in Section 106, or a certificate of coverage as defined in Section 10270.6, is first issued to or delivered to a new insured or a new policyholder in this state, or when a bail bond as defined in Section 1800.4 is first executed or delivered, the insurer shall include a written disclosure containing the name, address, toll-free telephone number, and internet website
 of the unit within the Department of Insurance that deals with consumer affairs. The telephone number shall be the same as that provided to consumers under Section 12921.1. The disclosure shall be printed in large, boldface type.

(b) The disclosure described in subdivision (a) shall also contain the address and customer service telephone number of the insurer, or the address and customer service telephone number of the agent or broker of record, or all of those addresses
 and telephone numbers. All addresses and telephone numbers for the insurer or the agent or broker of record shall be prominently displayed, in boldfaced type. The disclosure shall also contain a statement that the Department of Insurance should be contacted only after discussions with the insurer, or its agent or other representative, or both, have failed to produce a satisfactory resolution to the problem. If the policy or certificate was issued or delivered by an agent or broker, the disclosure shall specifically advise the insured to contact their agent or broker for assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 3.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.4. Proof of Coverage Disclosure [515. - 515.]

515.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, an insurer issuing policies of automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle liability insurance shall, upon request of either the named insured or the Department of Motor Vehicles, promptly issue to that person or the department written verification as to the existence of that coverage.

(2) Upon the request of the insured, an insurer may issue the verification as to the existence of that coverage in an electronic format to a mobile electronic device to the extent available. This section does not require an insurer to provide the verification of coverage in an electronic format in real time.

(b) For
 purposes of this section, “mobile electronic device” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 16028 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (AB 1708)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Loss [520. - 580.]



  ARTICLE 1. Transfer of Interest After Loss [520. - 520.]

520.

An agreement not to transfer the claim of the insured against the insurer after a loss has happened, is void if made before the loss except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 904.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Causes of Loss [530. - 533.7.]

530.

An insurer is liable for a loss of which a peril insured against was the proximate cause, although a peril not contemplated by the contract may have been a remote cause of the loss; but he is not liable for a loss of which the peril insured against was only a remote cause.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

530.5.

If a loss or damage results from a combination of perils, one of which is a landslide, mudslide, mudflow, or debris flow, coverage shall be provided if an insured peril is the efficient proximate cause of the loss or damage and coverage would otherwise be provided for the insured peril. Coverage shall be provided under the same terms and conditions as would be provided for the insured peril.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   (SB 917)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

An insurer is liable:

(a) Where the thing insured is rescued from a peril insured against, and which would otherwise have caused a loss, if, in the course of such rescue, the thing is exposed to a peril not insured against, and which permanently deprives the insured of its possession, in whole or in part.

(b) If a loss is caused by efforts to rescue the thing insured from a peril insured against.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

If a peril is specially excepted in a contract of insurance and there is a loss which would not have occurred but for such peril, such loss is thereby excepted even though the immediate cause of the loss was a peril which was not excepted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

An insurer is not liable for a loss caused by the wilful act of the insured; but he is not exonerated by the negligence of the insured, or of the insured’s agents or others.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

533.5.

(a) No policy of insurance shall provide, or be construed to provide, any coverage or indemnity for the payment of any fine, penalty, or restitution in any criminal action or proceeding or in any action or proceeding brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code by the Attorney General, any district attorney, any city prosecutor, or any county counsel, notwithstanding whether the exclusion or exception regarding this type of coverage or indemnity is expressly stated in the policy. 

(b) No policy of insurance shall provide, or be construed to provide, any duty to defend, as defined in subdivision (c), any claim in any criminal action or proceeding or in any action or proceeding brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code in which the recovery of a fine, penalty, or restitution is sought by the Attorney General, any district attorney, any city prosecutor, or any county counsel, notwithstanding whether the exclusion or exception regarding the duty to defend this type of claim is expressly stated in the policy. 

(c) For the purpose of this section, “duty to defend” means the insurer’s right or obligation to investigate, contest, defend, control the defense of, compromise, settle, negotiate the compromise or settlement of, or indemnify for the cost of any aspect of defending any claim in any criminal action or proceeding or in any action or proceeding brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code in which the insured expects or contends that (1) the insurer is liable or is potentially liable to make any payment on behalf of the insured or (2) the insurer will provide a defense for a claim even though the insurer is precluded by law from indemnifying that claim. 

(d) Any provision in a policy of insurance which is in violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is contrary to public policy and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1195, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

533.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, an insurer may defend a duly licensed physician or surgeon against any cause of action involving the performance of any act for which a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 489, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Notice and Proofs of Loss [550. - 557.5.]

550.

In case of loss upon an insurance against fire, an insurer is exonerated if notice thereof is not given to him without unnecessary delay by an insured or some person entitled to the benefit of the insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

Except in the case of life, marine, or fire insurance, notice of an accident, injury, or death may be given at any time within twenty days after the event, to the insurer under a policy against loss therefrom. In such a policy, no requirement of notice within a lesser period shall be valid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

When preliminary proof of loss is required by a policy, the insured is not bound to give such proof as would be necessary in a court of justice; but it is sufficient for him to give the best evidence in his power at the time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

All defects in a notice of loss, or in preliminary proof thereof, which the insured might remedy, and which the insurer omits to specify to him, without unnecessary delay, as grounds of objection, are waived.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

Delay in the presentation to an insurer of notice or proof of loss is waived, if caused by an act of his, or if he omits to make objection promptly and specifically upon that ground.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

If a policy requires, by way of preliminary proof of loss, the certificate or testimony of a person other than the insured or beneficiary, there is sufficient compliance with the requirement if the insured or the beneficiary (a) uses reasonable diligence to procure the certificate or testimony, and (b) in case of refusal to give it to him, furnishes reasonable evidence to the insurer that the refusal was not induced by just grounds of disbelief in the facts necessary to be certified or testified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 876.)
-------------------------------------------

557.

It is a misdemeanor for any person alone or in concert to prepare or make any bid or other writing which falsely purports to be a bona fide offer to repair a damaged motor vehicle or any other damaged property, with the intent that the same be used for the purpose of fraudulently leading an automobile liability insurer to believe:

(a) That a bid of some other person represents an offer made in open competition; or

(b) That the policy provisions of such insurer governing bids for the repair of vehicles or other property insured under the policy have been complied with in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1907.)
-------------------------------------------

557.5.

(a) A peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter shall not be required to report, nor shall any employer of the same be authorized to request or require that a peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter report, any accident in which he or she is involved while operating an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in subdivision (a), (b), or (f) of Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, or any employer-leased or employer-rented vehicle in the performance of his or her duty during the hours of his or her employment, to any person who has issued that peace officer, member of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter a private automobile insurance policy.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any provision in a private passenger motor vehicle owner’s automobile liability insurance policy, in the event of a loss or injury that occurs as the result of an accident during any time period when that private passenger motor vehicle is operated by an employee who is a peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter and is used by him or her at the request or direction of the employer in the performance of the employee’s duty, the vehicle’s owner shall have no liability. The peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or firefighter shall report and provide, within 10 days of the accident, to his or her private automobile insurer all documentation and information known to him or her related to the accident. The employer shall be considered the owner of the vehicle for the purpose of any liability and
 defense of the claim, and any losses shall be borne solely by the employer.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the employer shall assume liability for and defense of a claim in which a dispute exists as to whether the employer directed or requested the employee to use the private passenger motor vehicle when the loss occurred that gave rise to the claim.

(3) If it is subsequently determined that the employer did not direct or request the employee to use the private passenger motor vehicle when the loss occurred, the employer and employee shall provide notice to the private passenger motor vehicle’s insurer of this determination and provide all documentation and information known to him or her related to the claim or loss to the private passenger motor vehicle’s insurer within 10 days of the determination. The private passenger motor vehicle insurer that insures the
 vehicle shall reimburse the employer the reasonable costs of defense to the extent of the insurer’s obligation and up to the coverage limits under the applicable automobile liability insurance policy.

(4) A good faith delay by an employee in reporting the accident to his or her private passenger motor vehicle liability insurer, under the circumstances described in this section, shall not be used by the insurer as a basis to claim delayed reporting, noncooperation, prejudice, or the like as a means of avoiding the defense or indemnity obligations that would otherwise exist under the terms of the automobile liability insurance policy or applicable law in the absence of delayed reporting. This subdivision shall apply only if the employee complies with requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (3).

(5) This subdivision shall not apply to the operation of a private passenger motor
 vehicle when operated by an employee, otherwise subject to this section, for the purposes of reporting to or from his or her regularly assigned work location.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Peace officer” means every person defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(2) “Policy” shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 660.

(3) “Private passenger motor vehicle” or “private motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is insured under a personal automobile liability insurance policy insuring a single individual or individuals residing in the same household as the named insured, but does not include a vehicle with less than four wheels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 823, Sec. 2.   (AB 2298)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment of Automobile Collision Repairs [560. - 560.]

560.

(a) An insurer that issues a policy providing automobile collision coverage, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 660, or automobile physical damage coverage, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 660, shall, if a covered automobile is damaged by collision or otherwise and the insurer knows that the automobile will be repaired by the repairer, make payment by check or draft, payable to the repairer or to the named insured and the repairer, jointly, or, with the consent of the repairer, by an electronic funds transfer to the repairer, not later than 10 days subsequent to receipt of an itemized bill or invoice covering repairs authorized by the insurer which have been satisfactorily completed. This section applies if the insured has
 received actual notice that the repairer is doing work pursuant to a contract approved by the insurance company and, in that case, the payment shall include the name of the repairer.

(b) (1) This section does not limit the right of an insured to select, or prohibit an insured from selecting, the auto body repair shop or other repair facility to repair the damaged vehicle, as described in Section 758.5, nor does it limit the right of an insured to decide, or prohibit an insured from deciding, not to have the vehicle repaired. If the insured decides not to have the vehicle repaired, the insurer shall not withhold the payment of reasonable repair cost benefits that are otherwise payable under the policy.

(2) This section does not prohibit an insurer from restricting payment
 in cases of suspected fraud or from including a named loss payee or lienholder as an additional payee on the claims
 payment check or draft, to the degree the insurance policy permits the loss payee or lienholder to be added as additional payee on the claims payment check or draft.

(3) This section does not prohibit an insurer from requiring that a damaged vehicle be repaired as a condition for payment if the damage to the vehicle is sufficiently serious that safety features that are part of the vehicle’s operating systems are compromised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (AB 1538)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Certain Insurance Covering Real Property [570. - 572.]

570.

Except in the event that the insurer has previously obtained a release on a loss, each insurer which issues, amends, or renews, on or after January 1, 1975, a policy of insurance covering repair or reconstruction work on commercial, industrial, or residential real property and appurtenances thereon, shall, in the event of covered work being performed by a licensee under the Contractors License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), make payment by check or draft directly to the contractor performing the work, or, with the consent of the contractor, by an electronic funds transfer to the contractor performing the work, and not to the owner of the property,
 in every case in which all of the following conditions are present and the insurer has actual knowledge thereof:

(a) The property owner of record has, in a writing signed by him and transmitted to the insurer, stated all of the following:

(1) The work completed meets with his satisfaction.

(2) The insurer, upon direct payment to the contractor, is released from liability.

(3) The writing was not completed or signed by him until after all work was completed.

(b) The property owners of record, the named insured, and any loss payee have consented in writing to such direct payment and release from liability.

(c) The completed
 work has been certified by the appropriate public agency or authority as conforming to existing building, electrical, and construction codes.

(d) Each subcontractor of the contractor, and each materialman, to whom direct payment is to be made by the insurer has executed, and filed of record, releases of any and all claims, including, but not limited to, mechanic’s liens, which the subcontractor and materialman might have against the property or any appurtenance thereof, the property owners of record, the named insured, and any loss payee named in the policy, for any work the subcontractor performed, or material the materialman furnished, upon the property under the contract for which such payment is being made. The property owner or the contractor, as the case may be, shall submit to the insurer proof, satisfactory to it, of such execution and filing prior to the insurer’s making any direct payment provided for by this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 5.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

571.

Where the insurer has authorized the work and its liability is not in dispute, the direct payment provided for by Section 570 shall be made to the contractor performing the work not later than 30 days after the insurer has actual knowledge that the conditions of subdivisions (a) through (d) of Section 570 have been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------

572.

As used in this article, the term “loss payee” shall include, but not be limited to, any mortgagee of the insured real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Electronic Payment of Claims [580. - 580.]

580.

Every insurer required to make payment for a loss, may, with the consent of the insured, make payment by an electronic funds transfer. An insurer may not require an insured to consent to payment by an electronic funds transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 6.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Double Insurance [590. - 591.]

590.

A double insurance exists where the same person is insured by several insurers separately in respect to the same subject and interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

In case of double insurance, the several insurers are liable to pay losses thereon as follows:

(a) In fire insurance, each insurer shall contribute ratably, without regard to the dates of the several policies.

(b) In marine insurance, the liability of the several insurers for a total loss, whether actual or constructive, where the policies are not simultaneous, is in the order of the dates of the several policies. No liability attaches to a second or other subsequent policy, except as to the excess of the loss over the amount of all previous policies on the same interest. If two or more policies bear the same date, they are deemed to be simultaneous, and each insurer on simultaneous policies shall contribute ratably. The insolvency of any of the insurers does not affect the proportionate liability of the other insurers.

All insurers on the same marine interest shall contribute ratably for a partial or average loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Reinsurance [620. - 623.]

620.

A contract of reinsurance is one by which an insurer procures a third person to insure him against loss or liability by reason of such original insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

621.

A reinsurance is presumed to be a contract of indemnity against liability, and not merely against damage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

Where an insurer obtains reinsurance, he must communicate all the representations of the original insured, and also all the knowledge and information he possesses, whether previously or subsequently acquired, which are material to the risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

The original insured has no interest in a contract of reinsurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Rescission [650. - 651.]

650.

Whenever a right to rescind a contract of insurance is given to the insurer by any provision of this part such right may be exercised at any time previous to the commencement of an action on the contract. The rescission shall apply to all insureds under the contract, including additional insureds, unless the contract provides otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

Whenever an insurer gives notice of rescission of an automobile liability policy, upon request of the driver, the insurer, within 15 days of receipt of the request, shall furnish to the insured a statement setting forth the ground or grounds upon which the notice of rescission is based. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any insurer or authorized representative, or its licensed investigative sources, for any statements made by them in a written notice required to be given pursuant to this section. If the insurer fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the insured may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of the facts or information desired. Any such request shall be made in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 12950) of Chapter 2 of Division 3, and the commissioner shall exercise any power conferred upon him by that article as may be necessary to ensure compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Filing of Certificates [655. - 655.]

655.

Every insurer issuing policies of motor vehicle liability insurance within the meaning of Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, automobile liability insurance within the meaning of Section 16054 of that code, or any other liability insurance issued for vehicles with less than four wheels that meets the requirements of Section 16056 of that code shall also, as an incident thereto, complete and file the certificate or certificates provided for under Section 16431 of that code. The proof required by this section may be provided by the filing of a single certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1177, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.6. Reasons for Denial of Motor Vehicle Liability Insurance [657. - 658.]

657.

(a) Where any admitted insurer, licensed to issue motor vehicle liability policies as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, or any licensed insurance agent refuses to accept an application for such a policy or refuses to issue such a policy when a written application has been made, the refusing agent or refusing insurer shall furnish to the applicant for insurance a written statement explaining the reason or reasons relied upon for such action if within 30 days of such refusal the applicant requests in writing, from the agent or insurer who has refused to accept the application or to issue the policy, such a written explanation. Such statement shall be furnished within 30 days of receipt of such request.
